Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-444
Partner's liability to other partners after dissolution.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section and section 67-418, after dissolution a partner is liable to the other partners for the partner's share of any partnership liability incurred under section 67-442.

(2) A partner who, with knowledge of the dissolution, incurs a partnership liability under subdivision (2) of section 67-442 by an act that is not appropriate for winding up the partnership business is liable to the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from the liability.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 44.